Hawaii statutes.
[§482-26] Assignment; change of name.
(a) The registration of a mark shall be assignable with the goodwill of the
business in which the mark is used, or with that part of the goodwill of the
business connected with the use of and symbolized by the mark. An assignment
shall be executed in writing and may be recorded by filing an application with
the director and paying an appropriate recording fee. Upon recording of the
assignment, the director shall issue a new certificate for the remainder of the
term of the registration or of the last renewal thereof in the name of the new
assignee. An assignment of a registration of a mark under this section shall
be void against a subsequent purchaser for valuable consideration without
notice, unless the assignment is recorded with the director within three months
after the date thereof or prior to the subsequent purchase.

(b) Any registrant may change the name
of the person to whom the mark is issued by filing an application to change the
name of the registrant with the director and paying the appropriate fee. The
director shall issue a new certificate of registration in the name of the
registrant. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next